Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4697.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 268B.01, subdivision 15, is amended to read: Subd. 15. Covered employment. (a) "Covered employment" means performing services of whatever nature, unlimited by the relationship of master and servant as known to the common law, or any other legal relationship performed for wages or under any contract calling for the performance of services, written or oral, express or implied. (b) For the purposes of this chapter, covered employment means an employee's entire employment during a calendar year if: (1) 50 percent or more of the employment during the calendar year is performed in Minnesota; or (2) 50 percent or more of the employment during the calendar year is not performed in Minnesota or any other single state within the United States, or United States territory or foreign nation, but some of the employment is performed in Minnesota and the employee's residence is in Minnesota during 50 percent or more of the calendar year. (c) deleted text begin "deleted text end Covered employmentdeleted text begin "deleted text end does not include: (1) a self-employed individual; (2) an independent contractor; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (3) employment by a seasonal employee, as defined in subdivision 35deleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (4) employment of the state or a political subdivision, as an elected official, a member of a legislative body, or a member of the judiciary. new text end (d) Entities that are excluded under this section may opt in to coverage following a procedure determined by the commissioner. In such cases, services provided by employees are considered covered employment under subdivision 15. (e) The commissioner may adopt rules in accordance with chapter 14 to: (1) further define the application of this subdivision; and (2) establish the criteria for covered employment for individuals that do not meet the criteria in paragraphs (a) and (b), but that perform services as an employee to a Minnesota employer. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 268B.01, subdivision 17, is amended to read: Subd. 17. Employee. (a) "Employee" means an individual who performs services of whatever nature for an employer. (b) Employee does not include employees of the United States of America, self-employed individuals, or independent contractors. (c) Employee does not include seasonal employees as defined in subdivision 35. new text begin (d) Employee does not include an employee of the state or a political subdivision as an elected official, a member of a legislative body, or a member of the judiciary. new text end